District of Columbia statutes.
47-2104

Addition of new stocks during “closing-out sales” prohibited.

No person carrying on or conducting a closing-out sale or a sale of goods, wares, or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, under a license as provided in § 47-2102 [repealed] shall, during the continuance of such sale, add any goods, wares, or merchandise to the stock inventoried in his original application for such license, and no goods, wares, or merchandise shall be sold at or during such sale, excepting the goods, wares, or merchandise described and inventoried in such original application.

History

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 450, Pub. L. 86-219, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2104.
1973 Ed., § 47-3004.